Hawaii statutes.
[§183C-1] Findings and purpose. The
legislature finds that lands within the state land use conservation district
contain important natural resources essential to the preservation of the
State's fragile natural ecosystems and the sustainability of the State's water
supply. It is therefore, the intent of the legislature to conserve, protect,
and preserve the important natural resources of the State through appropriate
management and use to promote their long-term sustainability and the public
health, safety and welfare. [L 1994, c 270, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next